Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202664-416
Violation of act; removal of registration.

A person violating the Online Notary Public Act is subject to having his or her registration removed under the removal procedures provided in section 64-113.

Laws 2019, LB186, § 16.